Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.020

Grounds for issuance.

When it appears by the complaint that the plaintiff is entitled to the relief demanded and the relief, or any part thereof, consists in restraining the commission or continuance of some act, the commission or continuance of which during the litigation would produce great injury to the plaintiff; or when during the litigation, it appears that the defendant is doing, or threatened, or is about to do, or is procuring, or is suffering some act to be done in violation of the plaintiff's rights respecting the subject of the action tending to render the judgment ineffectual; or where such relief, or any part thereof, consists in restraining proceedings upon any final order or judgment, an injunction may be granted to restrain such act or proceedings until the further order of the court, which may afterwards be dissolved or modified upon motion. And where it appears in the complaint at the commencement of the action, or during the pendency thereof, by affidavit, that the defendant threatens, or is about to remove or dispose of his or her property with intent to defraud his or her creditors, a temporary injunction may be granted to restrain the removal or disposition of his or her property.

[ 2011 c 336 s 194; Code 1881 s 154; 1877 p 33 s 154; 1869 p 38 s 152; 1854 p 152 s 112; RRS s 719.]